Utah statutes.
70A-2a-532.   Additional remedies for loss of residual interest.
In addition to any other recovery permitted by this chapter, the lessor shall
be entitled to recover from the lessee an amount that will fully compensate
the lessor for any loss of or damage to the lessor's residual interest in the
goods caused by the default of the lessee.
